District of Columbia statutes.
7-2081.04

Rules.

Within 60 days of April 30, 2014, the Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter. The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within the 45-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.

Apr. 30, 2014, D.C. Law 20-97, § 5, 61 DCR 1589